Maine, session 132, LD1593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4635 is enacted to read:
§4635. Explanation of equity-based decisions
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a public entity or an
educational institution states that it is taking an action, including, without limitation, the
adoption of a policy, awarding of a contract or conducting its hiring practices, to advance
equity, that public entity or educational institution shall specify and make available on its
publicly accessible website the definition of "equity" that the public entity or educational
institution is using to make that decision and the metrics being used to measure equity.